Louisiana, session 2026, HB301.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 11-B of Title 23 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 23:1821 through 1823, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 11-B. INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR VOLUNTARY
PORTABLE BENEFITS
§1821. Short title
This Chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Independent Contractor
Voluntary Portable Benefits Act".
§1822. Definitions
For the purpose of this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
(1) "Bank" means a banking corporation or trust company entitled to operate
within this state as provided in Title 6 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
(2) "Hiring party" means a person or entity that hires or enters into a contract
for the performance of work with an independent contractor who meets the
rebuttable presumption standard established in R.S. 23:1711.1.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 301 ENROLLED
(3) "Portable benefit account" means an account owned by an independent
contractor that is assigned to an individual beneficiary and is not associated with a
specific employer or hiring party. The account shall be administered by a portable
benefit account provider, as defined in this Section, for the purpose of funding the
purchase of one or more benefit plans, including but not limited to plans that provide
any of the following:
(a) Health insurance.
(b) Income replacement insurance.
(c) Disability pay insurance.
(d) Life insurance.
(e) Retirement benefits.
(4) "Portable benefit account provider" means the administrator of a portable
benefit account and includes any of the following:
(a) A bank.
(b) An investment management firm.
(c) A technology provider or program manager that offers services through
a bank or investment management firm.
§1823. Contributions of funds to portable benefit accounts
A. Any person or entity, including an internet- or application-based entity,
may contribute funds to one or more portable benefit accounts.
B. A contribution to a portable benefit account may be made using the funds
of the hiring party or a percentage of funds withheld from compensation owed to an
independent contractor if all of the following occur:
(1) The withholding of compensation is expressly agreed to in writing by
both parties.
(2) The written agreement is clear, unambiguous, and prominently displayed
either in a services agreement or other contract between the independent contractor
and the hiring party or in a separate notice.
(3) The withholding of compensation is voluntary and requires an
independent contractor to opt in.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 301 ENROLLED
(4) The independent contractor is allowed to opt out of the agreement at any
time.
C. Contributions to a portable benefit account are voluntary and shall not be
used as criterion for determining an individual's employment classification. Such
contributions are not evidence of employer liability, and a court shall not construe
them as an element of an employment relationship for any purpose pursuant to the
Louisiana Workers' Compensation Law or Louisiana Employment Security Law.
D. The provisions of this Chapter shall not apply to the Louisiana Workers'
Compensation Law, R.S. 23:1020 et seq.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.